Massachusetts, session 194th, H2429.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 265 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after section 24C the
following section:— Section 24D. (a) Within 14 days after conviction of any crime listed in
section 13B, 13F, 13H, 22, 22A, 23, 24, or 24B of this Chapter, the person convicted shall
submit to medical testing to determine the presence of Human Immune Deficiency Virus and the
results of said testing shall be made available to the person tested and to the complaining witness
of the crimes for which the conviction stands. (b) Said testing shall be conducted under the
direction of the Superintendent, Warden or Sheriff of any institution in which the convicted
person is held in custody, or under the direction of the Probation Department of the Court in
which the conviction occurred, if the person convicted is not held in custody. (c)
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no person required to be tested under
this Section may be eligible for parole, work release, education release, or transfer to any facility
of 2

except a maximum or medium security facility, nor shall said person accrue any credits for
deductions for early release from his sentence until such time said testing is completed. (d) Any
person refusing to submit to testing under this section shall be returned to the Court of his
conviction within seven days following such refusal, and shall show cause why said person shall
not be held in contempt of said Court. At said hearing, the Court may, in its discretion, sentence
said person for contempt, revoke and revise the person’s sentence, or both. Such refusal shall
also constitute sufficient grounds for a Court to find a person in violation of any period if
probation.
of 2